2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-is.pat.txt
.a??3
.a??a4
.a??k2
.a??l4a
.af3n
.af3re
.afr3??
.af1s4
.agn5??
.al3e
.al4l
.am4s
.an3k
.ann4e
.ar2
.ar3a4b5
.arth5
.asp3
.aum5a
.??m4
.??n4a
.ba4
.da4
.dam5a
.dav3
.dr4
.ds4
.du4
.dust5
.ed5ik
.eftir5
.eigin5g
.eink4
.ekt4
.er4m
.eyf2
.fa4
.fi4
.fj??r3
.fl4
.fla4
.fr4
.fr??1
.ga2
.gar4
.gas5l
.gd4
.gem5
.gja2
.gl2
.gr4
.gu4
.her5sk
.il4
.ingj5
.is4m
.??s1l
.ja2
.jar4
.ka4
.kal5e
.kam5e
.kap??3
.kart5
.kast3
.kn4
.kr4
.kur4
.la4
.lag5e
.leik5sv
.l??b5
.lu4
.ma2
.maj5
.mak5r
.mi4
.mj4
.mu4
.mynst4
.na2
.n??5f
.n??5f
.ol4??u.
.??a4
.????5al
.??f4
.??g2
.??k4
.??m4i
.??s2
.pa4
.pl4
.ra2
.ram4
.r??4
.r????4
.r??m3
.saman5
.sk4
.ski4
.skj4
.skr4
.sl2
.sm4
.sm??3l
.sn4
.snar5a
.sp4
.spr4
.st4
.sta2
.ta4
.ti2
.til3
.t??5f
.tr4
.tu2
.tv??1
.ung3l
.unn5usta
.??r1
.??t1
.??t5s
.vegg5s
.vist3
.yfir3
.??vi3s
.??fl3
.??gr5
.??r3s
.??t3u
2a3a4
a4ab
a4ad
2a1??2
2a1b
ab4a
3ab??s
a5by
ab??k4l
4ac
2a1d4
a5d??
a4du
1a??
4a??a??
a??3al
a??3ar
2a??fa
4a??f??
a??3g
a??3i
2a??l
a??4li
4a??2m
2a??sh
3a??u.
2a??v
2a1e
a5ei
a4es
2af
af3ald
af3arn
a3f??
af4fr
af3g
a1fj
a3fl??
a1flu
af5ork
a1fr
af3r??
afr4u
a5fr??
4afsd
af1sk
4afsso
af2u
a1ful
a1fun
3afur??
2ag
a3gau
ag5??l
ag5is
a5gj
agn4ara
ag2ne
ag5ot
a1gr
ag4ra
ags4i??
ag4sp
ag4stj
ag4ul
ag3????
4a1h
4ai
a3i??
a4in
a??4h
2aj
a3j??
2ak
akaup4s
a5k??
a1ke
a5kinnin
a5kistu
a1kj
ak5rei
aks4l
4akss
ak3u
a3kv
a5ky
a5k??
a3k??
2al
a1lag
4aland
a5landi??
a5landinu
alas4
al??4
a4lem
al3er
al1f
al1g
5alge
3alh
alis4
al4??n
al3kj
alk5s
al3k2u
al4l??
all2s
allst4
al4l??
4alma??
al5mann
al5m2i
a3log
a5lok
al5op
a5l????
al4s??t
al5up
al5??
al3v4
a3ly
a1l??
a1l??
2am
am3ang
a3mann
am3ari
am3ars
am3a4s
am3dr
a3m??
am3k
am2m
amm4is
a1m??
am3se
ams2i
am1t
1an
3an.
3ana.
an3ada
4anag
2anal
4anau
2an??
4and.
and1e
4an4d??
andr4
4and??
4ane
an5ei
2ang
an4ga
ang1d
an4gj
ang5spi
an2g3??
4anib
4ani??
an5??n
2ank
ank5l
ank3v
3anm
ann5d
4annf
4annh
ann1k
4annl
4anns
annsk4
4an4o
anst4
an3sti
an3t??
3anu
4an??
4an??
4an??
4an??
2a3o
2a3??
2ap
ap3al
a3per
a3pil
a3po
a5pre
ap3te
a5p4un
a5p??r
1ar
3ar.
ar3afu
ara5kr
ar3ang
4arani
ar4arp
ar2as
ar5ast.
ar3au
2ar??4
4ar????
5ar3??k
3ar3??r
3ar1??s
ar1??t
3ard2
4ard??
4ar??.
ar??ar5??
4ar??i
4ar??s
3ar??u.
2are
3ar1ef
4aref.
5areig
5arein
a3rek
ar3el
ar3en
ar5er
a3ret
4a1r??
2arf
3arfe
3arf??
arfs3k
ar1fu
ar3gj
ar4gr??
args4
arg3sl
4ar5i??
4arif
ar3in
ar4ind
ar5ist.
4a5rit
4a1r??
ar3j4
4ark.
ark4is
ar5kj
ar3kr4
4arms
ar3m??
4arna.
4aro??
4arol
4arot
2ar??
2arp
4arra
arr2i
arr4u
ar4s??
3arse
ar1sk
ar4spi
arst4
5arst??
ar3su
ar5til
artr2
ar5tra??
ar3u
ar4u??
4ar4ug
5arum
2ar1??
a5r??s
ar3v4
ar3yf
4ar??
2ar??
a3r????
ar5??v
4ar??
as2
4a1sa
as3an
2a3s??
4ase
4as??
2asi
a5sinna
2asj
4a1sk
2asl
a3slag
2a1sm
4asn
4aso
4as??
2asp
asp??t4
4ass
ass4v
1ast
4asta??
ast4and
4astau
4aste
4ast??
4astig
4astin
ast4ing
4astir??
4a1st??
4astj
ast3l
4asto
2ast??
4astr??
ast5r????
4astr??
4a3str??
4astr??
4astul
4a3st4un
4ast??
4a3sty
4ast??
4ast??
2a1su
2a1sv
4as4y
2as??
4as??
2as??
2at
at3a??
a3tak
a3tal
at4anv
ata4r
a1te
at3ey
3ath
a1til
a3tj
3atk
atns3
a4t??
atr4a
at1re
3at1ri
at2sp
a5t2un
a1t??
at4ve
3atvi
a1t??
2a4u2
4au??.
au??5li
5au??n
aug4as
au4m
aum5ba
aum5un
aun5dr
aup5e
aup3l
a5upp
au4s
ausa5m
au4t
2a1??
2a1v
av4ar.
a3vir
2ay
a5yf
4az
2a1??
a2????
2a3??
4a5??
??1a
??ak4
??a5lo
??1b
??4bu
??1d4
4????
????2s
????3sn
????3sta
????2u
????3us
??1e
??f2
??5f??
??5f??
??3fl
??fl????4
??f5un
??g2i
??gl4
??gr2
??g1s
??g3v
??1h
??1i
??k2a
??kam4
??kap4
??k??4
??la3m
??l3arf
??l2as
??5lau
??3let
??lf3d4
??lf5sk
??l4m
??lm5an
??lm5u
??lp3
??l4se
??l5sva
??l5ug
??5l??
??l3????
2??m
??m??l5a
??msl4
??2n
??n4aro
??n2as
??n4o
??3n??
5??n??
??3o
4??p
??ra5g
??r3an
??rar4
??5r??
??r3f4
??r5g
??r5k4
??r1m
??rns4
??rn5sl
??r2st
??r5t
??r1u
??r3v
??5r??
??s5en
??1sk
??2ska
??4ske
??3s4l
??s2m
??st2
??st5i
??st5r????
??st5r??k
??st5v
4??su4
??s5va
??t3a??
??1te
??tr4as
??ttar3
5??ttin.
??tt3un
??1t??
??1u
??uk4
??3ve
??3v??
??1v??
??1??
??5????
b2a
4ba.
ba??k4
ba4h
bak5sl
ba2n
4bana
4ban??
bank5an
4bans
b5ant
bar2b
bar??4as
bar2n
b??4s
2b4b
bb3a??
bb3an
bb5arn
bb3i
bb3u??
1be
bess4
b2i2
bi??5i
bi??5lis
bi??5r4
bif1
bilj5
bill5
4binn
bisk3
b4it
bit2a
4b??a
2b3??s
2b3??u
3bj
bjar2
b4l2
bl4??unn
4bn
5bo
3b??4
b??k3s
b4r2
br5a??
bra4s
3bro
br4u
3br??
4bum4
bur2
3bur??
burst5a??
bu4s
1b??
b??f4
b??3sta
1by
1b??
b??k2i
b??n4a
1b??r
b5??ttism
1b??
4b??ki
c4a
ci4
ck4
4da.
daf4
dak2
3dal.
5dals
da1m4
d5ang
d4an??
d4arad
d4ar4a??
dar4??r
d3arf
d5arp
dask4
da3sl
4dav
d1b
2dd
4dea
d5ef
3deg
1deil
d1en
d5e??
5dep
d1f4
d1g2
d4gi
d1h
d1i
di5fu
d3ill
dim4
di3ma
di3nav
d2ine
dir3s
d??3d
d5????
d5??nu
3d??s
d??v3
3dj4
djarf5a
d1k2
d1l2
d2la
dl3a??
d3lag
d3lau
d4li??
dl3u
d1m
d5olf
d5????
d3??f
d??5l??
1d??2m
d??m5an
d??5ne
3d??r
d??2s
d??s5e
4dq
d5ra??f
dr4a??s5
d5ra??st
drafn4
dr4ara
3dreg
d5reip
d5rey
d5ri??a
d3r??k
d5ro??
dru4
d4r??t
2ds
d5sal
d4sj??
dsk2
ds4ko
ds5kun
ds1l
d5sn??
ds1s4
d1st4
d4sti
ds4u??
d4s??f
d1t2
d1u
duf4
5duft
duk4
d4umb
du5r??
d4usta
d3??n
d??n4a
d??t4
d1v4
4dw
1dy
1d??
d3??
1d??
4d??f
4d??r
3d??
??1a
??af4
??a3g
??ak4
??4albo
??3ald
??al4is
??4a1m4
??3a4n
??anmeg4
??ar1a
??3ar3f
??ar3l
??ar4lis
??ar3t4
??3ar??
??at4a
??3au
??3??2
??1b
??1d2
??1e
??3f4
??1g
??2ga
??2gi
??g4l
??4gn
??gu4
??3g4ul
??1h
??1i
??i3g
??ik4
??3in
??is5l
??ist4
??4ista
??is4ve
??j3as
??3j??
??4ju
??3ke
??1kr
??k2un
??3kunn
??1kv
??1l??
??l2in
??l4ist
??3l??
??l4ur
??1l??
??1m2
??num4
??3o
??3??
??1p2
??r5??t
??1re
??1r??
??3rik
??3r??k
??5r??
??r1u
??3r??
??1r??
??r????is5
??s5afl
??s5??
??4seg
??s4inn
??1sk
??skr4
??4sk??
??s5kv
??4sk??
??s4lu
??2so
??s3or
??ss4
??1st2
??2st??
??3st??
??s4u
??4svi
??2s??
??1t4
??1u
??3u??
??3ug
??3ull
??5uls
??5unn
??3unu
??3ur
??ur5??
??ur3f
??ur5g4
??ur5st
??1v
??v5a??
??v3ann
??v3arn
??1y
??5??
??1??
eat4
ebr5e
ed4e
e1dik
ed3it
e??3a2
e??al1
e??3il
e??4is
e2f
e3fal
ef3i
efj5an
ef4n
4eft.
2efts5
eg4ge
eg3i
egr5u
eg3u4l
egur4s
e4i
ei??5ar
ei??4st
eif4as
ei4ka
eik3li
eik3u
eil3ag
eil5??
ei2m
eim5u
eing4
1eink
4eino
eist5a??
e4k
ek2is
ekj5a
ekn3
ek3u
ek5??
e2l
el5??s
el4d
el3eg
elf3in
el4gr
el1i
4el??
el3??n
el4ke
el2l
ell5an
ell3e
elleg4
el3??
el3r
el1s??
5elsk
el4te
elu5s
e2m
em4ba
1embe
em5ens
em3i4
emj3
em4l
eml2i
empl5
em5u
e2n
4enc
en4g
eng3a
enik4
2enn
enn4t
en4t
ep4h
ep3i
epl5i
e4pr
ep4t
e4r
er3al
er5au
er5??
4er??
5ere
er5et
erf5ar
er2fr
erf3u
erg5l
er4gr
er3i
er2k
er4la
erl3i
er4l??
er4mi
erm5in
er5??l
er5skj
er1un
er2v
er3??
er??f4
e2s
es3a
es4ban
es4bu
4esj
e5ske
4eso
esp3a
es2s
est3a??
est5??
e3s??
etik4
et5ils
etna4
et5o
etr5an
etr3u
etul4
et2us
ext4u
5eyrar
??3b
??1d
????2s
??3fe
??1g4
??5ky
??1l
??la4g
??l4ara
??2li
??4lj
??l3r
??r1
??r4??
??r4r
??rs4
??r4un
??r3v
??3sm
??tt4ug
??t4un
??tur4
f3a??
fa2g
fa5k
1fall
fal4u
fa4n??
fa5p4
f2ar
f3ar??
f4are
f4arg
farka5l
f3arl
fast3e
f??3f
f5??ns
f??3r??
f??3ta
f??3v
f1b4
fd2an
f1dr
f5d??
f??a4l
1fe
f3ef
f3ein
3fel
f3end
ferl5i
fer3t
f1ey
1f??
f4fa
f2fo
f1fr
ff4st
ff??r4a
f1g2
f2ga
f2gi
fg4n
f1h
f3i??
fik4
f5il.
f5ili
f3ill
f5ils
f5ilv
fim3a
f4ine
f3inu
3fir??i
f3ir??u
firg2
f3irn
1firs
3f4isk
fi5so
f3ist.
f3istu
fis5v
f??4
f5??kv
f3??s
fj4a
fj5a??u
fj5ann
fj4e
f1k2
fl3and
fl4at
3flata
f5l??t
f4len
fl5g
1flo
5flut
flv4
4fl??
1fl??
f1m
4fn
fn1g
f5n4??
fn3k
fn5ok
1fo
4fop
forf4
fork4
1f??
fr2
4fra.
fr3a??
fra4m
fram3l
fr5and
4frar
2fri.
fr5in
fr??5m4
f3r??f
fru4
fr3u??
1fr??
2f3r??k
4fr??n
fs3??
f4sel
f4skaf
fsl4
fs3li
fs5na
f2so
fs5or
fsr4
fss4
f4sti
f5s4t??
fs1v
f4s??
ft3a??
fta4sk
ft5??
f3te
ft2s
fts5l
ft3u
ft4ul
f1u
4fu.
f3u??
3fugl
fund4as
2f3ur
5fur??ul
fur5e
furs4
fur3t
4f2us
f5ust.
f3ustu
f1v4
1fy
f3yrt
f1??
1f??
1f??
f??r4l
g1a
4ga.
4g3a??
gaf4ar
gagl4
3gagn
gak4
ga4lag
gal4is
5gals
5galt
gam3al
gam4i
g5and
1gang
gap4a
g4ard.
g2ar??
3gar??.
3gar??a
3gar??i
3gar??4s
5gar??ur
g3ar3f
gar4kl
gar3l
gar3t
4gas
g4as.
g4as??
g3ast.
ga5sta??
1gata
gat4r
g??2
3g??f
g??5le
g1b
gd4ans
g3de
g4du
gd4v
g??4aro
1ge
3gei
2g1el
gen4
g5end
3geng
g3ent
5ger??
ger5??
germ4
gerv5a
get3r
g1f2
ggis5
ggjaf3
ggj5ar
gg5r??
gg3r??
ggs4v
gg3ug
gg2v
g4g??
g1h
g1i
4gi.
4gik
gi5kv
3gild
g5ill
5gilt
gim4a
4g3i4n
gis4a
g4isp
g5ist??
g??r5a
g??s4
gjaf5ar
gjaf5o
gjak4
gjal4
gj4asta
1gj??
g1k4
gkal4
g1l??
g4le??
g3leg
gl5??
gl3f2
g3lit
g5l??n
gl3??t
glsk4
3glugg
glu3s
gl4y
g3l??r
g1m4
gnap4
gnart4
g4n??
gn3g
g3n??
gn4se
gn5ug
g4n??.
3gol
g3or
3g????
g??r5
g??4ur
g1p
g3rak4
gr4an
gra2s
gras5sv
g2r??
1grei
g3reis
g5rey??
gr2i
2gri.
gri??4
g3r??k
3gr??
3grund
3grunn
g3r????i
g2r??n
4gs
gs1??
g4sei
gsk4
gs4len
gsl2u
gs4l??
gs3m
gs5or
gs3s4
gs4si
gs1v
gt3a??
g3te
gt4s
2g1u
g4u??i
gu??l4
5g2u??s
gu??4s??
g3u??u
5gufu
gu4lagi
g5ulin
g3ull
g3uls
gu5mi??
g3un
gurf4
gur3g
g4usta
g3??
g??st5a
g1v
g2va
g3val
5gy??
g1??
1g??
g????4as
g??l4
g??r3
1g??4
h2a4
4ha.
ha??4
haf4sp
hand5r
hat3r
h??3g
h??l4
h??3re
h??4ski
h??5sta
h??s4u
h??t4
h??5ti
h??tr4
h??1v
he4
hei2
hellis5
hen2r
herk4
her3l4
hersk4
4hersla
hey5st
4hg
h4i
hig4
him5b
hin4
hit4as
hit4n
2h??2
h5??a
h??5b
hj4
h2l2
4hl.
4hls
hlu4
h4n2
hnja4
hnj??3l
holl3u
horm5
h??2
h??m5e
h??t3
hr4
4hs
hu4
hug1r
hug3u
hul5i
hundr4
h??2
h??m3
4h??r
h??s5k
hv4
hvar4
hvik3
5hy
h??f5a
h??tt4us
h??st3
2ia
i5as
4i5??
4i1b
ibb3
ibl3??
4ic
2id4
i3da
i1de
i3dr
1i??.
4i??f
2i??3g
i??5jar??
4i??r
4i??s
i??5sal
2i??u
4ie
i3ef
4if
if5arn
ifat4
i2fen
if4g
if3is
if4t
i4fy
4i2g
iga3m
ig??5u
ig1en
ig5r??
2i1h
2ii
i5i??
4ij
4ik
ik5??
ik3i
ik4is
ikt5o
i4kv??
2il
ila2g
il4ara
i1l??
4ile
ilf4a
il1fi
il1g4
i5li??u
il5in
il3ip
il5??s
il??4um
il4kv
il3lag
ill5an
il3l??
i1lo
il4sa
il1sk
il3sn
ilst4
il??k4
i5l??n
4im
im4b
imb3u
im3i
im4i??
im4la
im4m
i5m??
im4sv
1i2n
4inaf
in3an
4inar
inat5r
2i3nau
2ina2v
inav3??
4in??
4ind.
in4ga
ingj6arni
4ingr
ingv4
2inns
2innu
in1o
4in??
in1s4k
in2sp
in3sta
in5ul
4in??
2i3o
4i??
2ip
i5pil
3ir.
4ira
2i1r??
2ir??i
4ir??n
4ire
4ir??
irf2i
4irfs
4irig
2irit
4i1r??
2irk
irk3u
ir3l
ir1m4
4irnd
4irni.
4irnin
4irnis
4ir??
irs4??
irst4
ir3tal
irt5i
4irtl
irt4??
ir3ug
4ir??
4ir??
i2s
1is.
2isa
4isag
i5saga
i3sam
is2as
3isd
2ise
4ishv
3isins
4is??4
4isj
i3sj??
2isk
is4ka
isk5el
iski3m
isk5inn.
3isko
isk2u
isk1v
5isk??
2isl??
is3l??
5isma
is5me
4isni
isp3a??
isp3u
iss2i
is5s??
ist3al
2iste
4ist??
4istig
i5stik
ist4is
ist5??n
4isto
4ist??
4isty
4ist??
2ist??
is5t??k
is1v
4isvi
is4vi??
5isvin
i3sv??
2is??
2it
it3a??
it5ann
i5tei
4ith
it4ha
it5ill
itis4m
it2ka
itn5es
it3r??
it4st??
it3un
it4urn
it4ve
4iu
4i??
4i1v
i2v5??s
4ixs
2i3??
4i??
4i??
??1a
4??5ak
??al3
??5ald
??3ali
??2as
??5at
??5au
??5??
??b4a
??5bar
??4be
5??b??
??5dag
????2s3
????sk4
??3el
??3en
??et3n
??5ett
??2f
??f3e??
??4f3i
??f5r??
??fs3k
??f4sp
??2g
??g3e
??3gil
??1h
??1i
??k3a4
4??k4anar
4??k4ani
??k5is
??kk2i
5??km
??k2n
??kn5e
??k4s
??k3us
2??l
??lak4
??l2as
??l5??r
??l5f4
??3l??
5??lm??
??l3sk
4??m
??m3a??
??ma3l4
??m3an
??m4g
??m5o
??m5t
??m3un
??2n
??5n??
??n5e
??n3ge
??n5t
??nu3g4
??n3??
??3??p
????p5??u
4??p
??r5ak
??ra4s
??4r5i
??r4sv
??r3t
??1r??
??r5??
??2se
??4s5j
??sl2
3??slen
??sl5i
??s2m
??2st
??s5ter
??t5a??
??t5als
??t3i
??tj5
??t3re
??tr5??
4??ub
??5u??
4??ul
??u1ma
??3un
??u5p
??3ur
??4ura
4??usa
??u3t
4??uv
??vo4
??5??
j2a
j3a??
j5a??i
3jaf4n
ja5kl
jal2
jal5i??
ja5l??
j4am
j3an
j4aram
j3ari
jark4i
jarn4i??
j4ar??
jas4
jask4u
j3ast
j??l5as
j??l4f
j??lf3a
3j??rn
j??r4u
j??v3
j??var5
j1e
jend4a
j4ep
j4er
j4et
j1i
j??5b
j??5fr
j??2s
j??5ug
j??3ve
j1u
juf4
jug2
jug5as
ju4g??
j4u1l2
jur4e
5j2urt
jurt4i
j2us4
j3ust.
3j??fn
3j??k
j??l3k
j??l1m
ka??4s
kaf4an
ka4fr
kag4as
ka4j
kaj5a
kak4l
kal2
3kald
4kalf
k4all
3kam4b
kam2s5
k3ana
k4anaf
k3ann.
k4an??
k4ant
5kanta
4kapa
kark4
1k2ar2l
k4arm
k3arn
kar2r
k4art
kar4v
kask4
3kass
5kastal
k5astu.
1kau
5kaup
k??k5
k??m3
k1b
k1d4
2k1end
3kenn
3kerf
5kerl
ker4m
k1f4
kfalls5
k3g
kgl4
k1h
k3i??
ki??5l
kig4
k5ill
k5ilsi
kim2
k5ing
k4ip
k1ir
k3ir??
5kirk
k5irn
k4irt
k1is
k5ise
kisk4
k3ist.
k4it
ki3te
3k??l
k??s3
k??t3u
kja4l
kjar4a
kjar5f
kju3g
1kj??
3kj??r
kka5l
kk5e
kkj1??
k2kl
kk1l??
kk4li
kk3r??
kk4se
kkul4
kkv5i??
kl2
kl3a??
kl3ann
kl??4
5klef
kleif5a
k4lem
k1lin
3klj
3kluk
3kl??
1kl??
k1m2
k4mi??.
kn3ar
k2ney
kni5svi
3kn??
1ko
2kob
koff5
kol5d
kol4l
kol5sv
3kon
